Ohio, session 136, HB226.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 1349.07 of the Revised Code be 6
enacted to read as follows: 7
Sec. 1349.07. (A) As used in this section : 8
(1) "Application store" means a publicly available web 9
site, software application, or online service that distributes a 10
third-party platform's software applications to a computer, 11
mobile device, or any other general purpose computing device. 12
(2)(a) "Broadband internet access service" means a mass- 13
market retail service by wire or radio that provides the 14
capability to transmit data to and receive data from all or 15
substantially all internet endpoints, including any capabilities 16
that are incidental to and enable the operation of the 17
communications service, but excluding dial-up internet access 18
service. 19

H. B. No. 226 Page 2
As Introduced
(b) "Broadband internet access service" includes any 20
service that the federal communications commission finds to be 21
providing a functional equivalent of the service described in 22
division (A)(2)(a) of this section or that is used to evade the 23
protections set forth in this section. 24
(3) "Child" means an individual consumer known to be under 25
eighteen years of age. 26
(4)(a) "Covered application" means a software application, 27
web site, or other online service that is likely to be accessed 28
by children and that is intended to be run or directed by a user 29
on a computer, mobile device, or other general purpose computing 30
device. 31
(b) "Covered application" does not include any of the 32
following: 33
(i) A broadband internet access service; 34
(ii) A telecommunications service, as defined in 47 U.S.C. 35
153; 36
(iii) The delivery or use of a physical product 37
unconnected to the internet. 38
(5) "Covered entity" means a covered manufacturer or 39
developer of a covered application. 40
(6) "Covered manufacturer" means a manufacturer of a 41
device, an operating system for a device, or an application 42
store. 43
(7) "Developer" means any person, entity, or organization 44
that creates, owns, or controls an application and is 45
responsible for the design, development, maintenance, and 46
distribution of the application to users through an application 47

H. B. No. 226 Page 3
As Introduced
store. 48
(8)(a) "Device" means a device or portion of a device that 49
is designed for and capable of communicating across a computer 50
network with other computers or devices for the purpose of 51
transmitting, receiving, or storing data, including a desktop 52
computer, laptop, cellular telephone, tablet, or other device 53
designed for and capable of communicating with or across a 54
computer network and that is used for such purpose. 55
(b) "Device" does not include any of the following: 56
(i) Cable, fiber, or wireless modems; 57
(ii) Home routers, whether standalone or combined with 58
cable, fiber, or a wireless modem; 59
(iii) Managed set-top boxes; 60
(iv) Any physical object that only supports communications 61
within a closed user group or private network available to a 62
limited set of users. 63
(9) "Likely to be accessed by children" means, in the 64
context of an application, that either or both of the following 65
apply: 66
(a) Competent and reliable evidence regarding audience 67
composition demonstrates that the application is routinely 68
accessed by children; 69
(b) Internal research findings determine that the 70
application is routinely accessed by children. 71
(10) "Parent" includes a legal guardian. 72
(11) "User" means an individual consumer. 73
(B) Beginning January 1, 2026, no developer shall 74

H. B. No. 226 Page 4
As Introduced
distribute an application to users in this state or design, 75
develop, or maintain an application distributed to users in this 76
state without first determining whether the application is 77
likely to be accessed by children and, if so, providing notice 78
of that determination to each application store that distributes 79
the application to users in this state. 80
(C)(1) The covered manufacturer of a device sold in this 81
state on or after January 1, 2026, shall, upon the initial 82
activation of the device, take commercially reasonable and 83
technically feasible steps to determine or estimate the age of 84
the primary user of the device. 85
(2) The covered manufacturer of an operating system for a 86
device sold in this state before January 1, 2026, shall take 87
commercially reasonable and technically feasible steps to 88
determine or estimate the age of the primary user of the device 89
following the first update to the operating system that occurs 90
after January 1, 2027. 91
(D) On and after January 1, 2026, the covered manufacturer 92
of an application store with users in this state shall take 93
commercially reasonable and technically feasible steps to do all 94
of the following: 95
(1) Provide a mechanism for developers to provide notice 96
that an application is likely to be accessed by children; 97
(2) Obtain parental consent before permitting a user in 98
this state who the covered manufacturer knows or should know is 99
under sixteen years of age to download a covered application 100
from the application store; 101
(3) Provide developers of covered applications in the 102
application store with a signal regarding whether a parent has 103

H. B. No. 226 Page 5
As Introduced
provided consent when required under division (D)(2) of this 104
section; 105
(4) Provide a parent who consents to a child downloading 106
an application under division (D)(2) of this section with the 107
option to connect with the developer of the application for the 108
purpose of facilitating parental supervision tools. 109
(E) On and after January 1, 2026, a covered manufacturer 110
shall take commercially reasonable and technically feasible 111
steps to provide developers of covered applications with a 112
digital signal via a real-time application programming interface 113
regarding whether the covered manufacturer knows or estimates a 114
user to be: 115
(1) Under thirteen years of age; 116
(2) At least thirteen years of age, and under sixteen 117
years of age; 118
(3) At least sixteen years of age, and under eighteen 119
years of age; 120
(4) At least eighteen years of age. 121
(F) On and after January 1, 2026, a developer of a covered 122
application shall, to the extent applicable and technically 123
feasible, provide readily available features for parents to 124
support a child's use of the covered application. Such features 125
shall, at minimum, do all of the following: 126
(1) Manage which accounts are affirmatively linked to the 127
child; 128
(2) Manage the delivery of age appropriate content; 129
(3) Limit the amount of time that the child spends daily 130

H. B. No. 226 Page 6
As Introduced
on the covered application. 131
(G)(1) This section shall not be construed to require a 132
covered entity to access, collect, retain, re-identify, or link 133
information that the covered entity would not otherwise access, 134
collect, retain, re-identify, or link in the ordinary course of 135
business, except as absolutely necessary to comply with 136
divisions (C), (D), and (E) of this section. 137
(2) A covered entity is not required to implement new 138
account controls or safety settings if the covered entity's 139
existing account controls and safety settings are sufficient to 140
comply with this section. 141
(H)(1) Nothing in this section shall be construed to 142
modify, impair, or supersede the operation of any antitrust law, 143
including Chapter 1331. of the Revised Code and 15 U.S.C. 1, et 144
seq. 145
(2) An application store shall comply with this section in 146
a nondiscriminatory manner, including by: 147
(a) Imposing at least the same restrictions and 148
obligations on the application store's own applications and 149
application distribution as the application store does on third- 150
party applications or application distributors; 151
(b) Not using data collected from third parties, or 152
consent mechanisms deployed for third parties, in the course of 153
compliance with this section, for any of the following: 154
(i) To compete against those third parties; 155
(ii) To give the application store's services preference 156
relative to those of third parties; 157
(iii) To act in a manner adverse to competition. 158

H. B. No. 226 Page 7
As Introduced
(I)(1) The attorney general may bring a civil action 159
against a covered entity that the attorney general believes to 160
have violated this section. Before initiating such an 161
enforcement action, the attorney general shall provide written 162
notice to the covered entity identifying and explaining the 163
basis for each alleged violation. 164
(2) Except as otherwise provided in division (I)(4) of 165
this section, the attorney general shall not commence an 166
enforcement action if the covered entity, within forty-five days 167
after notice of the alleged violations is sent, does both of the 168
following: 169
(a) Cures all violations described in the notice; 170
(b) Provides the attorney general with a written statement 171
indicating that the violations are cured and agreeing to refrain 172
from further violations of this section. 173
(3) If the covered entity does not timely respond or 174
continues to violate this section after receiving the notice, 175
the attorney general may initiate the enforcement action and 176
seek damages of up to two thousand five hundred dollars for each 177
violation. Except as otherwise provided in division (I)(4) of 178
this section, damages begin to accrue on the forty-sixth day 179
following the date the attorney general sends notice of the 180
violation. 181
(4) Division (I)(2) of this section does not apply if the 182
covered entity fails to timely cure all of the violations 183
described in the notice or commits a subsequent violation of the 184
same type after curing the initial violation under that 185
division. Notwithstanding division (I)(3) of this section, if a 186
covered entity commits a subsequent violation of the same type 187

H. B. No. 226 Page 8
As Introduced
after reporting that the initial violation is cured, the 188
attorney general may bring a civil action at any time after 189
sending notice of the violation under division (I)(1) of this 190
section. Damages for the subsequent violation begin to accrue on 191
the date the violation occurs. 192
(5) It is an affirmative defense to a violation of 193
division (F) of this section if the covered entity acted in 194
reasonable reliance on a covered manufacturer's signals 195
regarding a user's age or parental consent. 196
(6) It is an affirmative defense to a violation of this 197
section if the covered entity took commercially reasonable and 198
technically feasible steps to comply. 199
(7) Nothing in this section shall be construed to provide 200
a private right of action. The attorney general has the 201
exclusive authority to enforce this section. 202